Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB277.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 350.240 is amended to read as follows:
The Energy and Environment Cabinet may promulgate[adopt] reasonable administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapters 13A for the reclamation of land disturbed
or removed in the mining of clay. The administrative[Such] regulations shall encourage
water impoundments and shall follow the standards established in Article III of the
Interstate Mining Compact. The cabinet shall have the authority to promulgate
administrative[adopt such] regulations prior to the effective date of the Interstate Mining
Compact and irrespective of whether the state becomes a member or withdraws from
membership in the Interstate Mining Compact.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/26/2026 1:45 PM Jacketed